Maine, session 132, LD1168.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1132, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Commercial boat yard. "Commercial boat yard" means a commercial facility
that leases storage, docking or mooring space to watercraft and is used primarily or used
predominantly by persons engaged in commercial fishing activities.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §1132, sub-§11, as amended by PL 2023, c. 671, §1, is further
amended to read:
11. Working waterfront land. "Working waterfront land" means a parcel of land, or
a portion thereof, that fully or partially abuts water to the head of tide or land located in the
intertidal zone that is used primarily or used predominantly to provide access to or support
the conduct of commercial fishing activities. "Working waterfront land" also includes a
commercial boat yard or a wharf or pier used primarily or used predominantly by persons
engaged in commercial fishing activities that include berthing a boat and the location of
small fishing houses for commercial fishing gear maintenance and storage. For purposes
of this subchapter, a parcel is deemed to include a unit of real estate notwithstanding the
fact that it is divided by a road, way, railroad or pipeline.